New York, session 2025-2026, S3265.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Persons employed by Fishers Island in the town of Southold, 4 Suffolk county, as constables. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07551-01-5